Hawaii statutes.
§89C-5 Implementation; approval and
appropriations. (a) Adjustments that do not require appropriations by the
respective legislative bodies may be implemented without legislative action.

(b) All other adjustments requiring
appropriations shall be submitted to the respective legislative body for
appropriations, at such time and in such manner as the legislative body may
require. The legislative body shall appropriate funds of the amount requested
or funds of a different amount after discussing the reasons with the
appropriate authority.

(c) No adjustment shall be made and no funds
shall be used for purposes of this chapter unless the legislative body has
appropriated the funds necessary to implement the adjustment. [L 1978, c 197,
pt of §2; am L 1982, c 159, §1(3); am L 2000, c 253, §110]

Attorney General Opinions

Suggests that pay adjustments for excluded workers not
inappropriate where they correspond to pay increases obtained by collective
bargaining unit employees. Att. Gen. Op. 85-5.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next